Utah statutes.
48-3a-1004.   Status of filings.

A filing under this part signed by a domestic entity becomes part of the public organic record of the entity if the entity's organic law provides that similar filings under that law become part of the public organic record of the entity.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

